Utah statutes.
41-22-10.2.   Off-highway vehicles -- Prohibited on interstate freeway.
It is unlawful for an off-highway vehicle to operate along, across, or within
the boundaries of an interstate freeway or controlled access highway, as
defined in Section 41-6a-102.
